closure.aff
# deverbals
SFX V N 1358
SFX V_alt  are    ellare [^cgi]are
SFX V_alt  are   cellare     onare
SFX V_alt  are   hellare   [cg]are
SFX V_alt  are    ellare [^cg]iare
SFX V_alt iare    ellare  [cg]iare
SFX V_alt  are  erellare [^cgi]are
SFX V_alt  are herellare   [cg]are
SFX V_alt  are  erellare [^cg]iare
SFX V_alt iare  erellare  [cg]iare
SFX V_alt  are    ettare [^cgi]are
SFX V_alt  are   hettare   [cg]are
SFX V_alt  are    ettare [^cg]iare
SFX V_alt iare    ettare  [cg]iare
SFX V_alt  are    ottare
SFX V_alt  are   ucciare
SFX V_c0    ecco  ecco/e            ecco
SFX V_c1       e    /e             are
SFX V_c1     are    o
SFX V_c1     are    i        [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   hi          [cg]are
SFX V_c1    iare    i
SFX V_c1     are    a/e
SFX V_c1     are    iamo/e   [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   hiamo/e     [cg]are
SFX V_c1    iare    iamo/e
SFX V_c1     are    ate/e
SFX V_c1     are    ano
SFX V_c1     are    avo
SFX V_c1     are    avi
SFX V_c1     are    ava
SFX V_c1     are    avamo
SFX V_c1     are    avate
SFX V_c1     are    avano
SFX V_c1     are    ai
SFX V_c1     are    asti
SFX V_c1     are    ò
SFX V_c1     are    ammo
SFX V_c1     are    aste
SFX V_c1     are    arono
SFX V_c1     are    erò      [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   herò        [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    erò      [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    erò       [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    erai     [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   herai       [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    erai     [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    erai      [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    erà      [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   herà        [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    erà      [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    erà       [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    eremo    [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   heremo      [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    eremo    [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    eremo     [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    erete    [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   herete      [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    erete    [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    erete     [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    eranno   [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   heranno     [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    eranno   [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    eranno    [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    erei     [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   herei       [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    erei     [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    erei      [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    eresti   [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   heresti     [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    eresti   [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    eresti    [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    erebbe   [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   herebbe     [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    erebbe   [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    erebbe    [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    eremmo   [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   heremmo     [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    eremmo   [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    eremmo    [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    ereste   [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   hereste     [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    ereste   [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    ereste    [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    erebbero [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   herebbero   [cg]are
SFX V_c1     are    erebbero [^cg]iare
SFX V_c1    iare    erebbero  [cg]iare
SFX V_c1     are    iate     [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   hiate       [cg]are
SFX V_c1    iare    iate
SFX V_c1     are    ino      [^cgi]are
SFX V_c1     are   hino        [cg]are
SFX V_c1    iare    ino
SFX V_c1     are    assi
SFX V_c1     are    asse
SFX V_c1     are    assimo
SFX V_c1     are    assero
SFX V_c1     are    ando/e
SFX V_c1     are    ante/e
SFX V_c1     are    anti/e
SFX V_c1     are    ato/e
SFX V_c1     are    ata/e
SFX V_c1     are    ati/e
SFX V_c1     are    à               dare
SFX V_c1     are    anno            dare
SFX V_c1     are    iedi            dare
SFX V_c1     are    etti            dare
SFX V_c1     are    esti            dare
SFX V_c1     are    iede            dare
SFX V_c1     are    ette            dare
SFX V_c1     are    emmo            dare
SFX V_c1     are    este            dare
SFX V_c1     are    iedero          dare
SFX V_c1     are    ettero          dare
SFX V_c1     are    arò             dare
SFX V_c1     are    arai            dare
SFX V_c1     are    arà             dare
SFX V_c1     are    aremo           dare
SFX V_c1     are    arete           dare
SFX V_c1     are    aranno          dare
SFX V_c1     are    arei            dare
SFX V_c1     are    aresti          dare
SFX V_c1     are    arebbe          dare
SFX V_c1     are    aremmo          dare
SFX V_c1     are    areste          dare
SFX V_c1     are    arebbero        dare
SFX V_c1     are    ia              dare
SFX V_c1     are    iano            dare
SFX V_c1     are    essi            dare
SFX V_c1     are    esse            dare
SFX V_c1     are    essimo          dare
SFX V_c1     are    essero          dare
SFX V_c1     are    a/E             dare
SFX V_c1     are    à              stare
SFX V_c1     are    anno           stare
SFX V_c1     are    etti           stare
SFX V_c1     are    esti           stare
SFX V_c1     are    ette           stare
SFX V_c1     are    emmo           stare
SFX V_c1     are    este           stare
SFX V_c1     are    ettero         stare
SFX V_c1     are    arò            stare
SFX V_c1     are    arai           stare
SFX V_c1     are    arà            stare
SFX V_c1     are    aremo          stare
SFX V_c1     are    arete          stare
SFX V_c1     are    aranno         stare
SFX V_c1     are    arei           stare
SFX V_c1     are    aresti         stare
SFX V_c1     are    arebbe         stare
SFX V_c1     are    aremmo         stare
SFX V_c1     are    areste         stare
SFX V_c1     are    arebbero       stare
SFX V_c1     are    ia             stare
SFX V_c1     are    iano           stare
SFX V_c1     are    essi           stare
SFX V_c1     are    esse           stare
SFX V_c1     are    essimo         stare
SFX V_c1     are    essero         stare
SFX V_c1     are    a/E            stare
SFX V_c1  andare  vado            andare
SFX V_c1  andare  vai             andare
SFX V_c1  andare  va/eE           andare
SFX V_c1  andare  vanno           andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andrò           andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andrai          andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andrà           andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andremo         andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andrete         andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andranno        andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andrei          andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andresti        andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andrebbe        andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andremmo        andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andreste        andare
SFX V_c1  andare  andrebbero      andare
SFX V_c1  andare  vada            andare
SFX V_c1  andare  vadano          andare
SFX V_c1     are  acere/V           fare
SFX V_c2       e    /e             ere
SFX V_c2     ere    o         [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    o     [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2  gliere  lgo
SFX V_c2   gnere  ngo
SFX V_c2     ere    i/e        [^i]ere
SFX V_c2    iere    i/e
SFX V_c2     ere    e
SFX V_c2     ere    iamo/e     [^i]ere
SFX V_c2    iere    iamo/e
SFX V_c2     ere    ete/e
SFX V_c2     ere    ono       [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    ono   [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2  gliere  lgono
SFX V_c2   gnere  ngono
SFX V_c2     ere    evo
SFX V_c2     ere    evi
SFX V_c2     ere    eva
SFX V_c2     ere    evamo
SFX V_c2     ere    evate
SFX V_c2     ere    evano
SFX V_c2     ere    ei        [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    ei    [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere etti         [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere etti     [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2    gere   si         [^g]gere
SFX V_c2   ggere  ssi
SFX V_c2  gliere  lsi
SFX V_c2   gnere  nsi
SFX V_c2     ere    esti
SFX V_c2     ere    é         [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    é     [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere ette         [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere ette     [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2    gere   se         [^g]gere
SFX V_c2   ggere  sse
SFX V_c2  gliere  lse
SFX V_c2   gnere  nse
SFX V_c2     ere    emmo
SFX V_c2     ere    este
SFX V_c2     ere    erono     [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    erono [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere ettero       [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere ettero   [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2    dere   sero       [^n]dere
SFX V_c2    gere   sero       [^g]gere
SFX V_c2   ggere  ssero
SFX V_c2  gliere  lsero
SFX V_c2   gnere  nsero
SFX V_c2     ere    erò
SFX V_c2     ere    erai
SFX V_c2     ere    erà
SFX V_c2     ere    eremo
SFX V_c2     ere    erete
SFX V_c2     ere    eranno
SFX V_c2     ere    erei
SFX V_c2     ere    eresti
SFX V_c2     ere    erebbe
SFX V_c2     ere    eremmo
SFX V_c2     ere    ereste
SFX V_c2     ere    erebbero
SFX V_c2     ere    a         [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    a     [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2  gliere  lga
SFX V_c2   gnere  nga
SFX V_c2     ere    iate       [^i]ere
SFX V_c2    iere    iate
SFX V_c2     ere    ano       [^in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    ano   [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2  gliere  lgano
SFX V_c2   gnere  ngano
SFX V_c2     ere    essi
SFX V_c2     ere    esse
SFX V_c2     ere    essimo
SFX V_c2     ere    essero
SFX V_c2     ere    endo/e
SFX V_c2     ere    ente/e
SFX V_c2     ere    enti/e
SFX V_c2     ere    uto/e  [^cginu]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    uto/e [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere   iuto/e         cere
SFX V_c2    dere   so/e       [^n]dere
SFX V_c2    gere   to/e       [^g]gere
SFX V_c2   ggere  tto/e
SFX V_c2  gliere  lto/e
SFX V_c2   gnere  nto/e
SFX V_c2     ere    uta/e  [^cginu]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    uta/e [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere   iuta/e         cere
SFX V_c2    dere   sa/e       [^n]dere
SFX V_c2    gere   ta/e       [^g]gere
SFX V_c2   ggere  tta/e
SFX V_c2  gliere  lta/e
SFX V_c2   gnere  nta/e
SFX V_c2     ere    uti/e  [^cginu]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    uti/e [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere   iuti/e         cere
SFX V_c2    dere   si/e       [^n]dere
SFX V_c2    gere   ti/e       [^g]gere
SFX V_c2   ggere  tti/e
SFX V_c2  gliere  lti/e
SFX V_c2   gnere  nti/e
SFX V_c2     ere    ute/e  [^cginu]ere
SFX V_c2     ere    ute/e [^gl][in]ere
SFX V_c2     ere   iute/e         cere
SFX V_c2    dere   se/e       [^n]dere
SFX V_c2    gere   te/e       [^g]gere
SFX V_c2   ggere  tte/e
SFX V_c2  gliere  lte/e
SFX V_c2   gnere  nte/e
SFX V_c2_ essere  sono            essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sei             essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  è               essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  siamo/e         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  siete           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  ero             essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  eri             essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  era             essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  eravamo         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  eravate         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  erano           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  fui             essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  fosti           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  fu              essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  fummo           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  foste           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  furono          essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sarò            essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sarai           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sarà            essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  saremo          essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sarete          essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  saranno         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sarei           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  saresti         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sarebbe         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  saremmo         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sareste         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sarebbero       essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sia             essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  siate/e         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  siano           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  fossi           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  fosse           essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  fossimo         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  fossero         essere
SFX V_c2_ essere  sii/e           essere
SFX V_c2_  avere  ho               avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  hai              avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  ha               avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  abbiamo/e        avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  hanno            avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  ebbi             avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  ebbe             avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  ebbero           avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avrò             avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avrai            avere
